Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2977.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 161.14, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 108. new text end new text begin Elmstrand * Finseth * Ruge Heroes Memorial Bridge. new text end new text begin The bridge on Burnsville Parkway over marked Interstate Highway 35W in the city of Burnsville is designated as "Elmstrand * Finseth * Ruge Heroes Memorial Bridge." Subject to section 161.139, the commissioner must adopt a suitable design to mark this highway and erect appropriate signs. new text end